District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-325.05

Rules for § 2-325.04.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-137, § 3, 55 DCR 1687
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(b), 58 DCR 1185
Delegation of Authority under D.C. Law 17-137, the “Excellence in Local Business Contract Grading Act of 2008”, see Mayor’s Order 2009-8, January 29, 2009 ( 56 DCR 2025).